Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.350

Contract for town printing.

Every town may designate any daily or weekly newspaper published or of general circulation therein as its official newspaper and all notices published in that newspaper for the period and in the manner provided by law or the ordinances of the town shall be due and legal notice.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.27.350. Prior: 1903 c 120 s 1; RRS s 9177.]